Maryland, session 2025, SB0926.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–103.
(a) A licensed health care professional does not violate § 3–102 of this subtitle by
administering or prescribing a procedure or administering, prescribing, or dispensing a
medication to relieve pain, even if the medication or procedure may hasten death or
increase the risk of death, unless the licensed health care professional knowingly
administers or prescribes the procedure or administers, prescribes, or dispenses the
medication to cause death.
(b) A licensed health care professional does not violate § 3–102 of this subtitle by
withholding or withdrawing a medically administered life–sustaining procedure:
(1) in compliance with Title 5, Subtitle 6 of the Health – General Article;
or
(2) in accordance with reasonable medical practice.
(C) A LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL DOES NOT VIOLATE § 3–102
OF THIS SUBTITLE BY TAKING ANY ACTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 5,
SUBTITLE 6A OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
[(c)] (D) (1) Unless the family member knowingly administers a procedure or
administers or dispenses a medication to cause death, a family member does not violate
§ 3–102 of this subtitle if the family member:
(i) is a caregiver for a patient enrolled in a licensed hospice program;
and
(ii) administers the procedure or administers or dispenses the
medication to relieve pain under the supervision of a health care professional.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection applies even if the medication or
procedure hastens death or increases the risk of death.

SENATE BILL 926 3
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 6A. THE HONORABLE ELIJAH E. CUMMINGS AND THE HONORABLE
SHANE E. PENDERGRASS END–OF–LIFE OPTION ACT.
5–6A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AID IN DYING” MEANS THE MEDICAL PRACTICE OF A PHYSICIAN
PRESCRIBING MEDICATION TO A QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL THAT THE QUALIFIED
INDIVIDUAL MAY SELF–ADMINISTER TO BRING ABOUT THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL’S
DEATH.
(C) “ATTENDING PHYSICIAN” MEANS THE LICENSED PHYSICIAN WHO HAS
PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE MEDICAL CARE OF THE INDIVIDUAL AND
TREATMENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S TERMINAL ILLNESS.
(D) “CAPACITY TO MAKE MEDICAL DECISIONS” MEANS THE ABILITY OF AN
INDIVIDUAL TO:
(1) UNDERSTAND THE NATURE AND CONSEQUENCES OF A HEALTH
CARE DECISION;
(2) UNDERSTAND THE SIGNIFICANT BENEFITS, RISKS, AND
ALTERNATIVES OF A HEALTH CARE DECISION; AND
(3) MAKE AND COMMUNICATE AN INFORMED DECISION TO HEALTH
CARE PROVIDERS, INCLUDING COMMUNICATION THROUGH ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL
FAMILIAR WITH THE INDIVIDUAL’S MANNER OF COMMUNICATING, IF THE OTHER
INDIVIDUAL IS AVAILABLE.
(E) “CONSULTING PHYSICIAN” MEANS A LICENSED PHYSICIAN WHO IS
QUALIFIED BY SPECIALTY OR EXPERIENCE TO CONFIRM A PROFESSIONAL
DIAGNOSIS AND PROGNOSIS REGARDING AN INDIVIDUAL’S TERMINAL ILLNESS.
(F) “HEALTH CARE FACILITY” MEANS:
(1) A HOSPITAL, AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) A HOSPICE FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN § 19–901 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) AN ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM, AS DEFINED IN § 19–1801 OF THIS

SENATE BILL 926
ARTICLE; OR
(4) A NURSING HOME, AS DEFINED IN § 19–1401 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(G) “HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED OR
CERTIFIED UNDER THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE TO PROVIDE HEALTH
CARE OR DISPENSE MEDICATION IN THE ORDINARY COURSE OF BUSINESS OR
PRACTICE OF A PROFESSION.
(H) “INFORMED DECISION” MEANS A DECISION BY AN INDIVIDUAL THAT IS:
(1) BASED ON AN UNDERSTANDING AND ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF THE
RELEVANT FACTS; AND
(2) MADE AFTER RECEIVING THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER
§ 5–6A–04(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(I) “LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL” MEANS A LICENSED
PSYCHIATRIST OR A LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST.
(J) “LICENSED PHYSICIAN” MEANS A PHYSICIAN WHO IS LICENSED TO
PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE.
(K) “LICENSED PSYCHIATRIST” MEANS A PSYCHIATRIST WHO IS LICENSED
TO PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE STATE.
(L) “LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST” MEANS A PSYCHOLOGIST WHO IS LICENSED
TO PRACTICE PSYCHOLOGY IN THE STATE.
(M) “MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL ASSESSMENT” MEANS ONE OR MORE
CONSULTATIONS BETWEEN AN INDIVIDUAL AND A LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH
PROFESSIONAL FOR THE PURPOSE OF DETERMINING THAT THE INDIVIDUAL HAS
THE CAPACITY TO MAKE MEDICAL DECISIONS.
(N) “PALLIATIVE CARE” MEANS HEALTH CARE CENTERED ON A
TERMINALLY ILL INDIVIDUAL AND THE INDIVIDUAL’S FAMILY THAT:
(1) OPTIMIZES THE INDIVIDUAL’S QUALITY OF LIFE BY
ANTICIPATING, PREVENTING, AND TREATING THE INDIVIDUAL’S SUFFERING
THROUGHOUT THE CONTINUUM OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S TERMINAL ILLNESS;
(2) ADDRESSES THE PHYSICAL, EMOTIONAL, SOCIAL, AND SPIRITUAL
NEEDS OF THE INDIVIDUAL;

SENATE BILL 926 5
(3) FACILITATES INDIVIDUAL AUTONOMY, THE INDIVIDUAL’S ACCESS
TO INFORMATION, AND INDIVIDUAL CHOICE; AND
(4) INCLUDES DISCUSSIONS BETWEEN THE INDIVIDUAL AND A
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER CONCERNING THE INDIVIDUAL’S GOALS FOR TREATMENT
AND APPROPRIATE TREATMENT OPTIONS AVAILABLE TO THE INDIVIDUAL,
INCLUDING HOSPICE CARE AND COMPREHENSIVE PAIN AND SYMPTOM
MANAGEMENT.
(O) “PHARMACIST” MEANS A PHARMACIST WHO IS LICENSED TO PRACTICE
PHARMACY IN THE STATE.
(P) “QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) IS AN ADULT;
(2) HAS THE CAPACITY TO MAKE MEDICAL DECISIONS;
(3) HAS A TERMINAL ILLNESS; AND
(4) HAS THE ABILITY TO SELF–ADMINISTER MEDICATION.
(Q) “RELATIVE” MEANS:
(1) A SPOUSE;
(2) A CHILD;
(3) A GRANDCHILD;
(4) A SIBLING;
(5) A PARENT; OR
(6) A GRANDPARENT.
(R) (1) “SELF–ADMINISTER” MEANS A QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL’S
AFFIRMATIVE, CONSCIOUS, AND VOLUNTARY ACT OF INGESTING MEDICATION
PRESCRIBED UNDER § 5–6A–07(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE TO BRING ABOUT THE
INDIVIDUAL’S DEATH.
(2) “SELF–ADMINISTER” DOES NOT INCLUDE TAKING MEDICATION BY
PARENTERAL INJECTION OR INFUSION.
(S) “TERMINAL ILLNESS” MEANS A MEDICAL CONDITION THAT, WITHIN

SENATE BILL 926
REASONABLE MEDICAL JUDGMENT, INVOLVES A PROGNOSIS FOR AN INDIVIDUAL
THAT THE CONDITION LIKELY WILL RESULT IN THE INDIVIDUAL’S DEATH WITHIN 6
MONTHS.
(T) “WRITTEN REQUEST” MEANS A WRITTEN REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING.
5–6A–02.
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY REQUEST AID IN DYING BY:
(1) MAKING AN INITIAL ORAL REQUEST TO THE INDIVIDUAL’S
ATTENDING PHYSICIAN;
(2) AFTER MAKING AN INITIAL ORAL REQUEST, MAKING A WRITTEN
REQUEST TO THE INDIVIDUAL’S ATTENDING PHYSICIAN, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 5–6A–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) MAKING A SECOND ORAL REQUEST TO THE INDIVIDUAL’S
ATTENDING PHYSICIAN AT LEAST:
(I) 15 DAYS AFTER MAKING THE INITIAL ORAL REQUEST; AND
(II) 48 HOURS AFTER MAKING THE WRITTEN REQUEST.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, NO OTHER
INDIVIDUAL, INCLUDING AN AGENT UNDER AN ADVANCE DIRECTIVE, AN ATTORNEY
IN FACT UNDER A DURABLE POWER OF ATTORNEY, A GUARDIAN, OR A
CONSERVATOR, MAY REQUEST AID IN DYING ON BEHALF OF AN INDIVIDUAL.
(C) AT LEAST ONE OF THE ORAL REQUESTS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE MADE WHILE THE INDIVIDUAL IS ALONE WITH THE
ATTENDING PHYSICIAN.
5–6A–03.
(A) A WRITTEN REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING REQUIRED UNDER
§ 5–6A–02(A)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE:
(1) IN SUBSTANTIALLY THE SAME FORM SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION
(C) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) SIGNED AND DATED BY THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
(3) WITNESSED BY AT LEAST TWO OTHER INDIVIDUALS WHO, IN THE

SENATE BILL 926 7
PRESENCE OF THE INDIVIDUAL, ATTEST THAT TO THE BEST OF THEIR KNOWLEDGE
AND BELIEF THE INDIVIDUAL IS:
(I) OF SOUND MIND; AND
(II) ACTING VOLUNTARILY AND NOT BEING COERCED TO SIGN
THE WRITTEN REQUEST.
(B) (1) ONLY ONE OF THE WITNESSES UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS
SECTION MAY BE:
(I) A RELATIVE OF THE INDIVIDUAL BY BLOOD, MARRIAGE, OR
ADOPTION; OR
(II) AT THE TIME THE WRITTEN REQUEST IS SIGNED BY THE
INDIVIDUAL, ENTITLED TO ANY BENEFIT ON THE INDIVIDUAL’S DEATH.
(2) THE INDIVIDUAL’S ATTENDING PHYSICIAN MAY NOT BE A
WITNESS.
(C) A WRITTEN REQUEST UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE IN
SUBSTANTIALLY THE FOLLOWING FORM:
MARYLAND REQUEST FOR MEDICATION FOR AID IN DYING
BY: _______________________________ DATE OF BIRTH: ____________________
(PRINT NAME) (MONTH/DAY/YEAR)
I, ______________________________________, AM AN ADULT OF SOUND MIND.
I AM SUFFERING FROM __________________________, WHICH MY ATTENDING
PHYSICIAN HAS DETERMINED WILL, MORE LIKELY THAN NOT, RESULT IN DEATH
WITHIN 6 MONTHS. I HAVE BEEN FULLY INFORMED OF MY DIAGNOSIS, MY
PROGNOSIS, THE NATURE OF MEDICATION TO BE PRESCRIBED TO AID ME IN DYING,
THE POTENTIAL ASSOCIATED RISKS, THE EXPECTED RESULT, THE FEASIBLE
ALTERNATIVES, AND THE ADDITIONAL HEALTH CARE TREATMENT OPTIONS,
INCLUDING PALLIATIVE CARE AND HOSPICE.
I HAVE ORALLY REQUESTED THAT MY ATTENDING PHYSICIAN PRESCRIBE
MEDICATION THAT I MAY SELF–ADMINISTER FOR AID IN DYING, AND I NOW CONFIRM
THIS REQUEST. I AUTHORIZE MY ATTENDING PHYSICIAN TO CONTACT A
PHARMACIST TO FILL THE PRESCRIPTION FOR THE MEDICATION ON MY REQUEST.
INITIAL ONE:

SENATE BILL 926
_____ I HAVE INFORMED MY FAMILY OF MY DECISION AND TAKEN THEIR OPINIONS
INTO CONSIDERATION.
_____ I HAVE DECIDED NOT TO INFORM MY FAMILY OF MY DECISION.
_____ I HAVE NO FAMILY TO INFORM OF MY DECISION.
I UNDERSTAND THAT I HAVE THE RIGHT TO RESCIND THIS REQUEST AT ANY TIME.
I UNDERSTAND THE FULL IMPORT OF THIS REQUEST AND I EXPECT TO DIE IF AND
WHEN I TAKE THE MEDICATION TO BE PRESCRIBED. I FURTHER UNDERSTAND THAT,
ALTHOUGH MOST DEATHS OCCUR WITHIN 3 HOURS, MY DEATH MAY TAKE LONGER,
AND MY ATTENDING PHYSICIAN HAS COUNSELED ME ABOUT THIS POSSIBILITY.
I MAKE THIS REQUEST VOLUNTARILY AND WITHOUT RESERVATION, AND I ACCEPT
FULL RESPONSIBILITY FOR MY DECISION TO REQUEST AID IN DYING.
SIGNED: _______________________________________ DATED: _____________________
DECLARATION OF WITNESSES
I UNDERSTAND THAT, UNDER MARYLAND LAW, A WITNESS TO A REQUEST FOR
MEDICATION FOR AID IN DYING MAY NOT BE THE INDIVIDUAL’S ATTENDING
PHYSICIAN. FURTHER, ONLY ONE OF THE WITNESSES MAY BE:
1. A RELATIVE OF THE INDIVIDUAL BY BLOOD, MARRIAGE, OR ADOPTION;
OR
2. AT THE TIME THE WRITTEN REQUEST IS SIGNED BY THE INDIVIDUAL,
ENTITLED TO ANY BENEFIT ON THE INDIVIDUAL’S DEATH.
BY SIGNING BELOW ON THE DATE THE INDIVIDUAL NAMED ABOVE SIGNS, I
DECLARE THAT:
THE INDIVIDUAL MAKING AND SIGNING THE ABOVE REQUEST:
1. IS PERSONALLY KNOWN TO ME OR HAS PROVIDED PROOF OF IDENTITY;
2. SIGNED THIS REQUEST IN MY PRESENCE ON THE DATE OF THE
INDIVIDUAL’S SIGNATURE;
3. APPEARS TO BE OF SOUND MIND AND NOT UNDER DURESS, FRAUD, OR
UNDUE INFLUENCE; AND
4. IS NOT AN INDIVIDUAL FOR WHOM I AM THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN.

SENATE BILL 926 9
WITNESS 1
(CHECK ONE)
_____________ I AM:
_____________ I AM NOT:
1. A RELATIVE OF THE INDIVIDUAL BY BLOOD, MARRIAGE, OR ADOPTION;
OR
2. AT THE TIME THE REQUEST IS SIGNED, ENTITLED TO ANY BENEFIT ON
THE INDIVIDUAL’S DEATH.
PRINTED NAME OF WITNESS 1 ______________________________
SIGNATURE OF WITNESS 1 ____________________________ DATE _______________.
WITNESS 2
(CHECK ONE)
_____________ I AM:
_____________ I AM NOT:
1. A RELATIVE OF THE INDIVIDUAL BY BLOOD, MARRIAGE, OR ADOPTION;
OR
2. AT THE TIME THE REQUEST IS SIGNED, ENTITLED TO ANY BENEFIT ON
THE INDIVIDUAL’S DEATH.
PRINTED NAME OF WITNESS 2 _______________________________
SIGNATURE OF WITNESS 2 ____________________________ DATE _______________.
5–6A–04.
(A) (1) WHEN AN ATTENDING PHYSICIAN IS PRESENTED WITH AN
INDIVIDUAL’S WRITTEN REQUEST, THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN SHALL DETERMINE
WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) IS A QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL;
(II) HAS MADE AN INFORMED DECISION; AND
(III) HAS VOLUNTARILY REQUESTED AID IN DYING.

SENATE BILL 926
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL IS NOT A QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL SOLELY DUE TO
AGE, DISABILITY, OR A SPECIFIC ILLNESS.
(B) AN ATTENDING PHYSICIAN SHALL ENSURE THAT AN INDIVIDUAL MAKES
AN INFORMED DECISION BY INFORMING THE INDIVIDUAL OF:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL’S MEDICAL DIAGNOSIS;
(2) THE INDIVIDUAL’S PROGNOSIS;
(3) THE POTENTIAL RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH SELF–ADMINISTERING
THE MEDICATION TO BE PRESCRIBED FOR AID IN DYING;
(4) THE PROBABLE RESULT OF SELF–ADMINISTERING THE
MEDICATION TO BE PRESCRIBED FOR AID IN DYING; AND
(5) ANY FEASIBLE ALTERNATIVES AND HEALTH CARE TREATMENT
OPTIONS, INCLUDING PALLIATIVE CARE AND HOSPICE.
(C) SUBJECT TO § 5–6A–06 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IF THE ATTENDING
PHYSICIAN DETERMINES THAT AN INDIVIDUAL IS A QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL, HAS
MADE AN INFORMED DECISION, AND HAS VOLUNTARILY REQUESTED AID IN DYING,
THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN SHALL REFER THE INDIVIDUAL TO A CONSULTING
PHYSICIAN TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES REQUIRED UNDER § 5–6A–05 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
5–6A–05.
A CONSULTING PHYSICIAN TO WHOM AN INDIVIDUAL HAS BEEN REFERRED
UNDER § 5–6A–04(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL:
(1) EXAMINE THE INDIVIDUAL AND THE INDIVIDUAL’S RELEVANT
MEDICAL RECORDS;
(2) CONFIRM THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN’S DIAGNOSIS THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL HAS A TERMINAL ILLNESS;
(3) IF REQUIRED UNDER § 5–6A–06 OF THIS SUBTITLE, REFER THE
INDIVIDUAL FOR A MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL ASSESSMENT;
(4) VERIFY THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS A QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL, HAS
MADE AN INFORMED DECISION, AND HAS VOLUNTARILY REQUESTED AID IN DYING;
AND

SENATE BILL 926 11
(5) DOCUMENT THE FULFILLMENT OF THE CONSULTING PHYSICIAN’S
DUTIES UNDER THIS SECTION IN WRITING.
5–6A–06.
(A) IF, IN THE MEDICAL OPINION OF THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN OR THE
CONSULTING PHYSICIAN, AN INDIVIDUAL MAY BE SUFFERING FROM A CONDITION
THAT IS CAUSING IMPAIRED JUDGMENT OR OTHERWISE DOES NOT HAVE THE
CAPACITY TO MAKE MEDICAL DECISIONS, THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN OR THE
CONSULTING PHYSICIAN SHALL REFER THE INDIVIDUAL TO A LICENSED MENTAL
HEALTH PROFESSIONAL FOR A MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL ASSESSMENT.
(B) IF AN INDIVIDUAL IS REFERRED FOR A MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL
ASSESSMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, AN ATTENDING PHYSICIAN
MAY NOT PROVIDE THE INDIVIDUAL MEDICATION FOR AID IN DYING UNTIL THE
LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL PROVIDING THE MENTAL HEALTH
PROFESSIONAL ASSESSMENT:
(1) DETERMINES THAT THE INDIVIDUAL HAS THE CAPACITY TO MAKE
MEDICAL DECISIONS AND IS NOT SUFFERING FROM A CONDITION THAT IS CAUSING
IMPAIRED JUDGMENT; AND
(2) COMMUNICATES THIS DETERMINATION TO THE ATTENDING
PHYSICIAN AND THE CONSULTING PHYSICIAN IN WRITING.
5–6A–07.
(A) AFTER THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN AND THE CONSULTING PHYSICIAN
HAVE FULFILLED THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER §§ 5–6A–04 AND 5–6A–05 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, AND AFTER THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL SUBMITS A SECOND ORAL
REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING, AS REQUIRED UNDER § 5–6A–02 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN SHALL:
(1) INFORM THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL THAT IT IS THE DECISION OF
THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL AS TO WHETHER AND WHEN TO SELF–ADMINISTER THE
MEDICATION PRESCRIBED FOR AID IN DYING;
(2) (I) INFORM THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL THAT THE QUALIFIED
INDIVIDUAL MAY WISH TO NOTIFY NEXT OF KIN OF THE REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING;
AND
(II) INFORM THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL THAT A FAILURE TO
NOTIFY NEXT OF KIN IS NOT A BASIS FOR DENIAL OF THE REQUEST FOR AID IN
DYING;

SENATE BILL 926
(3) COUNSEL THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL CONCERNING THE
IMPORTANCE OF:
(I) HAVING ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL PRESENT WHEN THE
QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL SELF–ADMINISTERS THE MEDICATION PRESCRIBED FOR
AID IN DYING;
(II) NOT TAKING THE MEDICATION IN A PUBLIC PLACE; AND
(III) PARTICIPATING IN A HOSPICE PROGRAM;
(4) ENCOURAGE THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL TO PREPARE AN
ADVANCE DIRECTIVE;
(5) CONFIRM THAT THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL’S REQUEST DOES
NOT ARISE FROM COERCION OR UNDUE INFLUENCE BY ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL BY
DISCUSSING WITH THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL, OUTSIDE THE PRESENCE OF ANY
OTHER INDIVIDUAL EXCEPT FOR AN INTERPRETER, WHETHER THE QUALIFIED
INDIVIDUAL IS FEELING COERCED OR UNDULY INFLUENCED BY ANOTHER
INDIVIDUAL;
(6) INFORM THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL THAT THE QUALIFIED
INDIVIDUAL MAY RESCIND THE REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING AT ANY TIME AND IN ANY
MANNER;
(7) VERIFY, IMMEDIATELY BEFORE WRITING THE PRESCRIPTION FOR
MEDICATION FOR AID IN DYING, THAT THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL IS MAKING AN
INFORMED DECISION;
(8) FULFILL THE DOCUMENTATION REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 5–6A–08 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(9) (I) IF THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN HOLDS A DISPENSING
PERMIT FROM THE STATE BOARD OF PHYSICIANS AND WISHES TO DISPENSE THE
MEDICATION, DISPENSE TO THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL:
1. THE PRESCRIBED MEDICATION FOR AID IN DYING;
AND
2. ANY ANCILLARY MEDICATIONS NEEDED TO MINIMIZE
THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL’S DISCOMFORT; OR
(II) IF THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN DOES NOT HOLD A

SENATE BILL 926 13
DISPENSING PERMIT OR DOES NOT WISH TO DISPENSE THE MEDICATION FOR AID IN
DYING, AND THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL REQUESTS AND PROVIDES WRITTEN
CONSENT FOR THE MEDICATION FOR AID IN DYING TO BE DISPENSED BY A
PHARMACIST:
1. CONTACT A PHARMACIST;
2. INFORM THE PHARMACIST OF THE PRESCRIPTION
FOR MEDICATION FOR AID IN DYING; AND
3. SUBMIT THE PRESCRIPTION FOR MEDICATION FOR
AID IN DYING TO THE PHARMACIST BY ANY MEANS AUTHORIZED BY LAW.
(B) (1) A PHARMACIST WHO HAS BEEN CONTACTED AND INFORMED BY AN
ATTENDING PHYSICIAN AND TO WHOM AN ATTENDING PHYSICIAN HAS SUBMITTED A
PRESCRIPTION FOR MEDICATION FOR AID IN DYING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY DISPENSE THE
MEDICATION FOR AID IN DYING AND ANY ANCILLARY MEDICATION ONLY TO THE
QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL, THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN, OR AN EXPRESSLY IDENTIFIED
AGENT OF THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL.
(2) IF A PHARMACIST WHO HAS BEEN CONTACTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(9)(II) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT WISH TO OR IS UNABLE TO
DISPENSE THE MEDICATION FOR AID IN DYING OR ANY ANCILLARY MEDICATION,
THE PHARMACIST SHALL NOTIFY THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL, THE ATTENDING
PHYSICIAN, AND ANY EXPRESSLY IDENTIFIED AGENT OF THE QUALIFIED
INDIVIDUAL THAT THE PHARMACIST DOES NOT WISH TO OR IS UNABLE TO DISPENSE
THE MEDICATION.
(C) IF A QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL SELF–ADMINISTERS MEDICATION FOR AID
IN DYING AND DIES, THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN MAY SIGN THE QUALIFIED
INDIVIDUAL’S DEATH CERTIFICATE.
5–6A–08.
(A) WITH RESPECT TO A REQUEST BY A QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL FOR AID IN
DYING, THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN SHALL ENSURE THAT THE MEDICAL RECORD OF
THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL DOCUMENTS OR CONTAINS:
(1) THE BASIS FOR DETERMINING THAT THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL
IS AN ADULT;
(2) ALL ORAL AND WRITTEN REQUESTS BY THE QUALIFIED
INDIVIDUAL FOR MEDICATION FOR AID IN DYING;

SENATE BILL 926
(3) THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN’S:
(I) DIAGNOSIS OF THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL’S TERMINAL
ILLNESS AND PROGNOSIS; AND
(II) DETERMINATION THAT THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL HAS
THE CAPACITY TO MAKE MEDICAL DECISIONS, HAS MADE AN INFORMED DECISION,
AND HAS VOLUNTARILY REQUESTED AID IN DYING;
(4) DOCUMENTATION THAT THE CONSULTING PHYSICIAN HAS
FULFILLED THE CONSULTING PHYSICIAN’S DUTIES UNDER § 5–6A–05 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(5) A REPORT OF THE OUTCOME OF AND DETERMINATIONS MADE
DURING THE MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL ASSESSMENT IF:
(I) THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL WAS REFERRED FOR A MENTAL
HEALTH PROFESSIONAL ASSESSMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–6A–06 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(II) THE MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL ASSESSMENT WAS
PROVIDED;
(6) DOCUMENTATION OF THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN’S OFFER TO
THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL TO RESCIND THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL’S REQUEST
FOR MEDICATION FOR AID IN DYING AT THE TIME THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN
WROTE THE PRESCRIPTION FOR THE MEDICATION FOR THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL;
AND
(7) A STATEMENT BY THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN:
(I) INDICATING THAT ALL REQUIREMENTS FOR AID IN DYING
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE HAVE BEEN MET; AND
(II) SPECIFYING THE STEPS TAKEN TO CARRY OUT THE
QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL’S REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING, INCLUDING THE MEDICATION
PRESCRIBED FOR AID IN DYING.
(B) THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT ANY
INFORMATION REGARDING IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SUBTITLE REQUIRED BY
REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER § 5–6A–09(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
5–6A–09.

SENATE BILL 926 15
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO FACILITATE THE
COLLECTION OF INFORMATION UNDER § 5–6A–08(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PRODUCE AND MAKE AVAILABLE TO THE
PUBLIC AN ANNUAL STATISTICAL REPORT OF INFORMATION COLLECTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) RECORDS OR INFORMATION COLLECTED OR MAINTAINED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE ARE NOT SUBJECT TO SUBPOENA OR DISCOVERY AND MAY NOT BE
INTRODUCED INTO EVIDENCE IN ANY JUDICIAL OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDING,
EXCEPT TO RESOLVE MATTERS CONCERNING COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE OR
AS OTHERWISE SPECIFICALLY PROVIDED BY LAW.
5–6A–10.
A PERSON THAT, AFTER A QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL’S DEATH, IS IN POSSESSION
OF MEDICATION PRESCRIBED FOR AID IN DYING THAT HAS NOT BEEN
SELF–ADMINISTERED SHALL DISPOSE OF THE MEDICATION IN A LAWFUL MANNER.
5–6A–11.
(A) FOR ALL LEGAL RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS, RECORD–KEEPING
PURPOSES, AND OTHER PURPOSES GOVERNED BY THE LAWS OF THE STATE,
WHETHER CONTRACTUAL, CIVIL, CRIMINAL, OR OTHERWISE, THE DEATH OF A
QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL BY REASON OF THE SELF–ADMINISTRATION OF MEDICATION
PRESCRIBED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE A DEATH FROM
NATURAL CAUSES, SPECIFICALLY AS A RESULT OF THE TERMINAL ILLNESS FROM
WHICH THE QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL SUFFERED.
(B) A PROVISION IN A CONTRACT OR ANY OTHER LEGAL INSTRUMENT THAT
IS CONTRARY TO SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IS VOID.
(C) SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO
PROHIBIT THE PROSECUTION OF A PERSON FOR MURDER OR ATTEMPTED MURDER
IF THE PERSON, WITH THE INTENT OR EFFECT OF CAUSING THE INDIVIDUAL’S
DEATH:
(1) WILLFULLY ALTERS OR FORGES A REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING;
(2) CONCEALS OR DESTROYS A RESCISSION OF A REQUEST FOR AID IN
DYING;
(3) COERCES OR EXERTS UNDUE INFLUENCE ON AN INDIVIDUAL TO

SENATE BILL 926
COMPLETE A REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING; OR
(4) COERCES OR EXERTS UNDUE INFLUENCE ON AN INDIVIDUAL TO
DESTROY A RESCISSION OF A REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING.
(D) (1) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT AUTHORIZE A LICENSED PHYSICIAN OR
ANY OTHER PERSON TO END AN INDIVIDUAL’S LIFE BY LETHAL INJECTION, MERCY
KILLING, OR ACTIVE EUTHANASIA.
(2) ACTIONS TAKEN IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE DO NOT,
FOR ANY PURPOSE, CONSTITUTE SUICIDE, ASSISTED SUICIDE, MERCY KILLING, OR
HOMICIDE.
5–6A–12.
(A) A PROVISION IN A STATE OR FEDERAL INSURANCE POLICY, AN ANNUITY,
A CONTRACT, OR ANY OTHER AGREEMENT, ISSUED OR MADE ON OR AFTER OCTOBER
1, 2025, IS NOT VALID TO THE EXTENT THAT THE PROVISION WOULD ATTACH
CONSEQUENCES TO OR OTHERWISE RESTRICT OR INFLUENCE AN INDIVIDUAL’S
DECISION TO MAKE OR RESCIND A REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) AN OBLIGATION UNDER A CONTRACT EXISTING ON OCTOBER 1, 2025,
MAY NOT BE CONDITIONED ON OR AFFECTED BY THE MAKING OR RESCINDING OF A
REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) A QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL’S ACT OF SELF–ADMINISTERING MEDICATION
FOR AID IN DYING MAY NOT HAVE AN EFFECT UNDER A LIFE INSURANCE POLICY, A
HEALTH INSURANCE POLICY OR CONTRACT, OR AN ANNUITY CONTRACT THAT
DIFFERS FROM THE EFFECT UNDER THE POLICY OR CONTRACT OF THE QUALIFIED
INDIVIDUAL’S DEATH FROM NATURAL CAUSES.
5–6A–13.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 5–6A–14(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) A PERSON MAY NOT BE SUBJECT TO CIVIL OR CRIMINAL LIABILITY
OR PROFESSIONAL DISCIPLINARY ACTION FOR PARTICIPATING IN GOOD FAITH
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING BEING PRESENT WHEN A QUALIFIED
INDIVIDUAL SELF–ADMINISTERS MEDICATION PRESCRIBED FOR AID IN DYING; AND
(2) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER OR A HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD
MAY NOT SUBJECT A PERSON TO CENSURE, DISCIPLINE, SUSPENSION, LOSS OF
LICENSE, LOSS OF PRIVILEGES, LOSS OF MEMBERSHIP, OR ANY OTHER PENALTY FOR

SENATE BILL 926 17
PARTICIPATING OR REFUSING TO PARTICIPATE IN GOOD FAITH COMPLIANCE WITH
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL’S REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING OR AN ATTENDING
PHYSICIAN’S PRESCRIPTION OF MEDICATION MADE IN GOOD FAITH COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT:
(1) CONSTITUTE NEGLECT FOR ANY PURPOSE OF LAW; OR
(2) PROVIDE THE SOLE BASIS FOR THE APPOINTMENT OF A
GUARDIAN OR CONSERVATOR.
5–6A–14.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “NOTIFY” MEANS TO PROVIDE A SEPARATE STATEMENT IN
WRITING TO A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER SPECIFICALLY INFORMING THE HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER, BEFORE THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER’S PARTICIPATION IN AID IN
DYING, OF A HEALTH CARE FACILITY’S POLICY ABOUT PARTICIPATION IN AID IN
DYING.
(3) (I) “PARTICIPATE IN AID IN DYING” MEANS TO PERFORM THE
DUTIES OF AN ATTENDING PHYSICIAN, A CONSULTING PHYSICIAN, OR A LICENSED
MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) “PARTICIPATE IN AID IN DYING” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. MAKING AN INITIAL DETERMINATION THAT AN
INDIVIDUAL HAS A TERMINAL ILLNESS AND INFORMING THE INDIVIDUAL OF THE
MEDICAL PROGNOSIS;
2. PROVIDING INFORMATION ABOUT THIS SUBTITLE TO
AN INDIVIDUAL ON THE REQUEST OF THE INDIVIDUAL; OR
3. PROVIDING AN INDIVIDUAL, ON REQUEST OF THE
INDIVIDUAL, WITH A REFERRAL TO ANOTHER PHYSICIAN.
(B) (1) A HEALTH CARE FACILITY MAY PROHIBIT A HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER FROM PARTICIPATING IN AID IN DYING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE ON THE
PREMISES OF THE PROHIBITING HEALTH CARE FACILITY IF THE PROHIBITING
HEALTH CARE FACILITY HAS NOTIFIED ALL HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS WITH
PRIVILEGES TO PRACTICE ON THE PREMISES OF THE PROHIBITING HEALTH CARE

SENATE BILL 926
FACILITY’S POLICY REGARDING PARTICIPATING IN AID IN DYING.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT A HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER FROM PROVIDING HEALTH CARE SERVICES THAT DO NOT CONSTITUTE
PARTICIPATING IN AID IN DYING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO AN INDIVIDUAL.
(C) A HEALTH CARE FACILITY MAY SUBJECT A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER TO
THE FOLLOWING SANCTIONS IF THE SANCTIONING HEALTH CARE FACILITY HAS
NOTIFIED THE SANCTIONED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER, BEFORE THE SANCTIONED
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER PARTICIPATES IN AID IN DYING, THAT THE SANCTIONING
HEALTH CARE FACILITY PROHIBITS PARTICIPATION IN AID IN DYING:
(1) LOSS OF PRIVILEGES, LOSS OF MEMBERSHIP, OR OTHER
SANCTIONS PROVIDED UNDER THE MEDICAL STAFF BYLAWS, POLICIES, AND
PROCEDURES OF THE SANCTIONING HEALTH CARE FACILITY IF THE SANCTIONED
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER IS A MEMBER OF THE SANCTIONING HEALTH CARE
FACILITY’S MEDICAL STAFF AND PARTICIPATES IN AID IN DYING WHILE ON THE
PREMISES OF THE SANCTIONING HEALTH CARE FACILITY;
(2) TERMINATION OF A LEASE OR ANY OTHER PROPERTY CONTRACT
OR OTHER NONMONETARY REMEDIES PROVIDED BY A LEASE OR OTHER PROPERTY
CONTRACT, NOT INCLUDING LOSS OR RESTRICTION OF MEDICAL STAFF PRIVILEGES
OR EXCLUSION FROM A PROVIDER PANEL, IF THE SANCTIONED HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER PARTICIPATES IN AID IN DYING WHILE ON THE PREMISES OF THE
SANCTIONING HEALTH CARE FACILITY OR ON PROPERTY THAT IS OWNED BY OR
UNDER THE DIRECT CONTROL OF THE SANCTIONING HEALTH CARE FACILITY; OR
(3) TERMINATION OF A CONTRACT OR OTHER NONMONETARY
REMEDIES PROVIDED BY A CONTRACT IF THE SANCTIONED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER
PARTICIPATES IN AID IN DYING WHILE ACTING IN THE COURSE AND SCOPE OF THE
SANCTIONED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER’S CAPACITY AS AN EMPLOYEE OR
INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR OF THE SANCTIONING HEALTH CARE FACILITY.
(D) SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT:
(1) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER FROM PARTICIPATING IN AID IN
DYING:
(I) WHILE ACTING OUTSIDE THE COURSE AND SCOPE OF THE
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER’S CAPACITY AS AN EMPLOYEE OR INDEPENDENT
CONTRACTOR OF THE SANCTIONING HEALTH CARE FACILITY; OR
(II) OFF THE PREMISES OF THE SANCTIONING HEALTH CARE
FACILITY OR OFF ANY PROPERTY THAT IS OWNED BY OR UNDER THE DIRECT

SENATE BILL 926 19
CONTROL OF THE SANCTIONING HEALTH CARE FACILITY; OR
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL FROM CONTRACTING WITH THE INDIVIDUAL’S
ATTENDING PHYSICIAN OR CONSULTING PHYSICIAN TO ACT OUTSIDE THE COURSE
AND SCOPE OF THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN’S OR CONSULTING PHYSICIAN’S
CAPACITY AS AN EMPLOYEE OR INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR OF THE SANCTIONING
HEALTH CARE FACILITY.
5–6A–15.
(A) (1) PARTICIPATION BY A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER IN AID IN DYING
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IS VOLUNTARY.
(2) A HEALTH CARE FACILITY MAY NOT REQUIRE THE PHYSICIANS ON
THE MEDICAL STAFF OF THE HEALTH CARE FACILITY TO PARTICIPATE IN AID IN
DYING.
(B) IF AN INDIVIDUAL REQUESTS OR INDICATES AN INTEREST IN AID IN
DYING AND THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN OF THE INDIVIDUAL DOES NOT WISH TO
PARTICIPATE IN AID IN DYING, THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN SHALL INFORM THE
INDIVIDUAL THAT THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN DOES NOT WISH TO PARTICIPATE.
(C) ON REQUEST, AN ATTENDING PHYSICIAN EXPEDITIOUSLY SHALL
TRANSFER A COPY OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S RELEVANT MEDICAL RECORDS TO ANOTHER
ATTENDING PHYSICIAN IF:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL REQUESTS OR INDICATES AN INTEREST IN AID IN
DYING;
(2) THE ORIGINAL ATTENDING PHYSICIAN IS UNABLE OR UNWILLING
TO PARTICIPATE IN AID IN DYING FOR THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
(3) THE INDIVIDUAL TRANSFERS THE INDIVIDUAL’S CARE TO
ANOTHER ATTENDING PHYSICIAN.
(D) A HEALTH CARE FACILITY MAY ADOPT WRITTEN POLICIES PROHIBITING
A LICENSED PHYSICIAN ASSOCIATED WITH THE HEALTH CARE FACILITY FROM
PARTICIPATING IN AID IN DYING, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–6A–14 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
5–6A–16.
(A) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER’S LICENSE OR CERTIFICATION AND IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS

SENATE BILL 926
SUBTITLE SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE ACTING WITHIN THE STANDARD OF CARE OF THE
PROVIDER’S LICENSE OR CERTIFICATION.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT EXEMPT A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER FROM
MEETING THE MEDICAL STANDARDS OF CARE FOR AN INDIVIDUAL’S MEDICAL
TREATMENT.
5–6A–17.
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO WILLFULLY ALTERS OR FORGES A WRITTEN
REQUEST MADE UNDER §§ 5–6A–02 AND 5–6A–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR CONCEALS
OR DESTROYS A RESCISSION OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S WRITTEN REQUEST WITHOUT THE
AUTHORIZATION OF THE INDIVIDUAL AND WITH THE INTENT OR EFFECT OF CAUSING
THE INDIVIDUAL’S DEATH IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT
TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000
OR BOTH.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO COERCES OR EXERTS UNDUE INFLUENCE ON AN
INDIVIDUAL TO MAKE A WRITTEN REQUEST UNDER §§ 5–6A–02 AND 5–6A–03 OF
THIS SUBTITLE FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENDING THE INDIVIDUAL’S LIFE OR TO
DESTROY A RESCISSION OF A WRITTEN REQUEST IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON
CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10 YEARS OR A FINE
NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 OR BOTH.
(C) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE IMPOSED
SEPARATE FROM AND CONSECUTIVE TO OR CONCURRENT WITH A SENTENCE FOR
ANY CRIME BASED ON THE ACT ESTABLISHING THE VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(D) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT LIMIT ANY LIABILITY FOR CIVIL DAMAGES
RESULTING FROM ANY OTHER NEGLIGENT CONDUCT OR INTENTIONAL MISCONDUCT
BY ANY PERSON.
Article – Insurance
27–208.1.
(A) FOR ALL LEGAL RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS AND OTHER PURPOSES
GOVERNED BY THIS ARTICLE, THE DEATH OF AN INDIVIDUAL BY REASON OF THE
SELF–ADMINISTRATION OF MEDICATION PRESCRIBED UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE
6A OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE A DEATH FROM
NATURAL CAUSES, SPECIFICALLY AS A RESULT OF THE TERMINAL ILLNESS FROM
WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL SUFFERED.
(B) ACTIONS TAKEN IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 6A OF THE

SENATE BILL 926 21
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE DO NOT, FOR ANY PURPOSE, CONSTITUTE SUICIDE,
ASSISTED SUICIDE, MERCY KILLING, OR HOMICIDE.
(C) A PROVISION IN AN INSURANCE POLICY OR CONTRACT OR AN ANNUITY
CONTRACT ISSUED OR DELIVERED ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2025, IS NOT VALID TO
THE EXTENT THAT THE PROVISION WOULD ATTACH CONSEQUENCES TO OR
OTHERWISE RESTRICT OR INFLUENCE AN INDIVIDUAL’S DECISION TO MAKE OR
RESCIND A REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 6A OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(D) AN OBLIGATION UNDER AN INSURANCE POLICY OR CONTRACT OR AN
ANNUITY CONTRACT EXISTING ON OCTOBER 1, 2025, MAY NOT BE CONDITIONED ON
OR AFFECTED BY THE MAKING OR RESCINDING OF A REQUEST FOR AID IN DYING
UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 6A OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(E) THE ACT BY AN INSURED OF SELF–ADMINISTERING MEDICATION FOR
AID IN DYING UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 6A OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE
MAY NOT HAVE AN EFFECT UNDER A LIFE INSURANCE POLICY, A HEALTH INSURANCE
POLICY OR CONTRACT, OR AN ANNUITY CONTRACT THAT DIFFERS FROM THE
EFFECT UNDER THE POLICY OR CONTRACT OF THE INSURED’S OR ANNUITANT’S
DEATH FROM NATURAL CAUSES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid for any reason in a
court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or any other
application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.